Georgia, session 2025_26, SB236.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 20-2-150 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to eligibility for
enrollment under the "Quality Basic Education Act," is amended by revising subsection (e)
as follows:
"(e) A student whose parent or guardian is on active duty in the United States armed forces
and has received official military orders to transfer into or within this state shall be eligible
for enrollment, in the same manner and time as for students residing within the local school
system, in the public school of the attendance zone in which he or she will be residing
S. B. 236
- 1 -

LC 46 1190S (SCS)
intends to reside or in a public school authorized pursuant to Code Section 20-2-295, prior
to physically establishing residency within the local school system regardless of whether
such student's parent or guardian has entered into a lease, purchased a residence, or
otherwise secured housing within such attendance zone, upon presentation of a copy of the
official military orders to the local school system. In the event that such student does not
subsequently physically reside in the attendance zone in which he or she intended to reside,
such student's parent or guardian shall enroll such student in the public school of the
attendance zone in which he or she actually physically resides and shall provide proof of
such physical residency to such local school system at the conclusion of the current school
year. A high school student who is a junior or senior shall be permitted to remain enrolled
in his or her current school placement until graduation despite any changes in physical
residency."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 236
- 2 -